Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-907
Act; applicability.

The Livestock Animal
Welfare Act shall not apply to:

(1) Care or
treatment of a livestock animal or other conduct by a veterinarian or veterinary
technician licensed under the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act
that occurs within the scope of his or her employment, that occurs while acting
in his or her professional capacity, or that conforms to commonly accepted
veterinary practices;

(2) Euthanasia of a livestock animal or livestock animals as conducted
by the owner or by his or her agent or a veterinarian upon the owner's request;

(3) Research
activity carried on by any research facility currently meeting the standards
of the federal Animal Welfare Act, 7 U.S.C. 2131 et seq., as such act existed
on January 1, 2010;

(4) Commonly accepted animal welfare practices with respect to livestock
animals and commercial livestock operations, including their transport from
one location to another and nonnegligent actions taken by personnel or agents
of the Department of Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture
in the performance of duties prescribed by law;

(5) Commonly followed
practices occurring in conjunction with the slaughter of animals for food
or byproducts;

(6) Commonly accepted animal training practices; and

(7) Commonly accepted
practices occurring in conjunction with sanctioned rodeos, animal racing,
and pulling contests.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 7.

Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, see section 38-3301.